Georgia, session 2025_26, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 5 of Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to Brady Law Regulations, is amended by revising Code Section 16-11-171, relating
to definitions, as follows:
"16-11-171.
As used in this part, the term:
(1) 'Center' means the Georgia Crime Information Center within the Georgia Bureau of
Investigation.
(2) 'Dealer' means any person licensed as a dealer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 921, et
seq.
S. B. 19
- 1 -

LC 39 4478
(3) 'Firearm' means any weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel
a projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon,
any firearm muffler or firearm silencer, or any destructive device as defined in 18 U.S.C.
Section 921(a)(3).
(4) 'Involuntarily hospitalized' means hospitalized as an inpatient in any mental health
facility pursuant to Code Section 37-3-81 or hospitalized as an inpatient in any mental
health facility as a result of being adjudicated mentally incompetent to stand trial or being
adjudicated not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the crime pursuant to Part 2 of
Article 6 of Chapter 7 of Title 17.
(5) 'NICS' means the National Instant Criminal Background Check System created by
the federal 'Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act' (P. L. No. 103-159).
(6) 'Pistol grip' means a grip or similar feature on a weapon that can function as a grip
for the trigger hand.
(7) 'Semiautomatic assault weapon' means:
(A) Any selective firearm capable of fully semiautomatic or burst fire at the option of
the user;
(B) Any revolving cylinder shotgun;
(C) Any semiautomatic rifle that can accommodate a detachable magazine and that has
at least two of the following:
(i) A folding or telescoping stock;
(ii) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon;
(iii) A bayonet mount;
(iv) A flash suppressor or threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash
suppressor; or
(v) A grenade launcher;
(D) A semiautomatic pistol that can accommodate a detachable magazine and that has
at least two of the following:
S. B. 19
- 2 -

LC 39 4478
(i) An ammunition magazine that attaches to the pistol outside of the pistol grip;
(ii) A threaded barrel that can accommodate a barrel extender, flash suppressor,
forward handgrip, or silencer;
(iii) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel and
that allows the shooter to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being
burned;
(iv) A manufactured weight of 50 ounces or more when the pistol is unloaded; or
(v) A semiautomatic version of an automatic firearm; or
(E) A semiautomatic shotgun that has at least two of the following:
(i) A folding or telescoping stock;
(ii) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon;
(iii) A fixed magazine capacity in excess of five rounds; or
(iv) The capability to accommodate a detachable magazine."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-11-172.1.
(a) No transfer or purchase of a semiautomatic assault weapon conducted by a licensed
importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer shall be completed until the tenth day
after the initiation of such transfer or purchase; provided, however, that the calculation of
the ten days shall not include Saturdays, Sundays, or state or federal holidays; and
provided, further, that an NICS check may be conducted within such ten days.
(b) Licensed importers, licensed manufacturers, and licensed dealers shall, during normal
business hours, make records available for inspection by any law enforcement agency for
purposes of any criminal investigation.
(c) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply when a semiautomatic assault
weapon is being transferred to or purchased by:
S. B. 19
- 3 -

LC 39 4478
(1) The holder of a weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129;
or
(2) Any person provided for under Code Section 16-11-130.
(d) Any licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer that violates this Code
section or any purchaser or transferee that uses fraud or false representation to avoid the
requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five
years."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 19
- 4 -